District of Columbia statutes.
38-1952

Repealed

Sick and emergency leave.

Repealed.

Oct. 13, 1949, 63 Stat. 842, ch. 686, § 1
Oct. 29, 1951, 65 Stat. 660, ch. 601, § 1
Dec. 18, 1967, 81 Stat. 659, Pub. L. 90-212, § 1(a)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 90-319, § 5
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 18, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1020.
1973 Ed., § 31-691.